Florida, session 2026, HB663.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 390.111, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
390.111 Civil remedies for abortion.—
(1) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Clawback provision" means a law of another state
authorizing a civil action or penalty against a person for
bringing, attempting to bring, assisting, or providing legal
representation in an action authorized by this section.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb663-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 663 2026
(b) "Family member" means the spouse, parent, or sibling
of a woman upon whom an abortion was induced or performed, or
upon whom an abortion was attempted to be induced or performed.
The term also includes the father of the unborn child.
(2) CAUSE OF ACTION.—
(a) A family member has a civil cause of action against
any person who violates s. 390.0111(2) whether the violation
originates in this state or another jurisdiction.
(b) A person, whether or not a citizen or resident of this
state, who personally or through an agent violates s.
390.0111(2), is under the jurisdiction of the courts of this
state for purposes of the causes of action in this subsection
and subsection (5).
(c) Notwithstanding any contractual provision to the
contrary, general law applies to any action brought under this
section.
(d) The actual inducement or performance of an abortion is
not required to commence an action authorized by this section.
(e) It is not a defense to a suit brought under this
section that:
1. The woman upon whom the abortion was induced or
performed, or upon whom the abortion was attempted to be induced
or performed, consented to any procedure or action.
2. The law of a foreign state or foreign country permits
the action that forms the basis for the suit.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb663-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 663 2026
(f) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, a
cause of action may not be commenced under this section against
a woman upon whom an abortion was induced or performed, or upon
whom an abortion was attempted to be induced or performed.
(3) DAMAGES.—A court may enter a judgment awarding the
prevailing plaintiff:
(a) Injunctive relief.
(b) Statutory damages of $100,000.
(c) Reasonable costs and attorney fees.
(4) LIMITATIONS PERIOD.—An action brought under subsection
(2) must be commenced within 2 years after the cause of action
accrues.
(5) CLAWBACK PROVISIONS.—
(a) A court or authority of this state may not recognize,
enforce, or give effect to a judgment or order issued under a
clawback provision, except to the extent required by the United
States Constitution.
(b)1. A person against whom an action is brought or a
judgment is entered under a clawback provision may bring a civil
action against any person who brought such action, obtained such
judgment, or sought to enforce such judgment, and a court may
enter a judgment awarding the person against whom the clawback
action was brought:
a. Injunctive relief.
b. Actual damages, which includes any amount awarded in an
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb663-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 663 2026
action based on a clawback provision.
c. Reasonable costs and attorney fees incurred in bringing
such action, or incurred in defending or responding to the
action based on the clawback provision.

In the event that actual damages are not awarded or actual
damages total less than $100,000, the court may award statutory
damages in an amount sufficient to result in a total award of up
to $100,000.
2. It is not a defense to an action brought under this
paragraph that the plaintiff failed to seek relief in the
clawback proceeding or that a court in another jurisdiction did
not grant relief.
(6) PROTECTION OF PRIVACY IN COURT PROCEEDINGS.—In each
civil action brought under this section, the court may require
all pleadings, orders, and other formal documents to be styled
in a manner to protect the name of the woman upon whom an
abortion was induced or performed, or upon whom an abortion was
attempted to be induced or performed, from public disclosure.
(7) CONSTRUCTION.—This section shall be liberally
construed to effectuate its remedial purposes.
Section 2. If any provision of this act or its application
to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity
does not affect other provisions or applications of the act
100 which can be given effect without the invalid provision or
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb663-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 663 2026
101 application, and to this end the provisions of this act are
102 severable.
103 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb663-00